Louisiana, session 2026, HB912.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:571(B)(introductory paragraph), 572(B)(1), 582(A)(introductory
paragraph), (B)(introductory paragraph), and (C)(introductory paragraph), 583(A),
(B)(introductory paragraph) and (2) and (C)(introductory paragraph) 584(C), 586(A)(1) and
(3), 589(A) and (B), 590(A)(2), 595(B)(6) through (8), and 599 (A)(2)(a) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 37:563(18) through (20), 571(B)(5), 582(B)(4), 583(C)(4),
and 595(B)(9) through (11) hereby enacted to read as follows:
Page 1 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-804 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 912
§563. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following words have the following meanings:
* * *
(18) "Alternative hair design" means the practice of styling hair in registered
salons and shops by twisting, wrapping, weaving, extending, locking, or braiding the
hair by either the use of hands, mechanical devices, or appliances. The practice of
alternative hair design shall include the application of shampoos, conditioners,
antiseptics, powders, oils, clays, lotions, or tonics to hair and wig making or wiggery
but shall not include the application of dyes, reactive chemicals, or other
preparations to alter the structure or style of the natural hair. It also includes the use
of any hair which is not a person’s own hair, including synthetic hair, wigs, braids,
postitch, or any applied hair.
(19) "Alternative hairstylist" means a person who engages in the practice of
alternative hair design.
(20) "Mechanical devices" are clips, combs, crochet hooks, curling irons,
curlers, flat irons, hairpins, scissors, blunt-tipped needles, thread, and hair binders.
* * *
§571. Louisiana State Board of Cosmetology; creation; domicile; membership
* * *
B. The board shall be composed of eight nine members appointed by the
governor, who shall serve at the pleasure of the governor, with the following
qualifications:
* * *
(5) One member shall be a registered alternative hairstylist.
* * *
§572. Qualifications of board members; recusal from certain transactions
* * *
B. Each member shall be one of the following:
Page 2 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-804 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 912
(1) A registered cosmetologist, esthetician, or manicurist, or alternative
hairstylist who has been actively engaged, for at least five years prior to his
appointment, in the practice of cosmetology, esthetics, or manicuring, or alternative
hair design. However, no more than one esthetician, and one manicurist, and one
alternative hairstylist shall serve on the board.
* * *
§582. Qualifications for certificate as a registered cosmetologist, esthetician, or
manicurist, or alternative hairstylist; out-of-state licensees
A. In order to receive a certificate of registration as a registered
cosmetologist, esthetician, or manicurist, or alternative hairstylist, a person shall, in
addition to the requirements set forth in Subsection B of this Section, meet all of the
following requirements:
* * *
B. In addition to the requirements set forth in Subsection A of this Section,
a person shall also meet the following requirements in order to obtain his certificate
of registration as a registered cosmetologist, esthetician, or manicurist, or alternative
hairstylist:
* * *
(4) To obtain a certificate as a registered alternative hairstylist, a person shall
have completed and passed a course at a registered or licensed school of
cosmetology approved by the board.
C. The board shall issue the appropriate certificate of registration to any
person who possesses a license or certificate of registration to practice as a
cosmetologist, esthetician, or manicurist, or alternative hairstylist from another state
or from a foreign country and who also meets the following requirements:
* * *
§583. Qualifications for certificate as a registered teacher; continuing education
A. No person shall teach cosmetology, esthetics, or manicuring, or
alternative hair design without a certificate of registration issued by the board.
Page 3 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-804 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 912
B. In order to receive a certificate of registration as a registered teacher of
cosmetology, esthetics, or manicuring, or alternative hairstylist, a person shall, in
addition to the requirements of Subsection C of this Section, meet all of the
following requirements:
* * *
(2) Have completed and passed the curriculum for the teacher's training
course under the supervision of a licensed teacher for a minimum study of five
hundred hours in not less than three months or possess a license as an esthetics,
cosmetology, or manicuring, or alternative hair design instructor issued by another
state.
C. In addition to the requirements set forth in Subsection B of this Section,
a person shall also meet the following requirements in order to obtain a certificate
of registration as a registered teacher of cosmetology, esthetics, or manicuring, or
alternative hair design:
* * *
(4) To obtain a certificate as a registered teacher of alternative hair design,
a person shall possess an alternative hair design or cosmetology certificate, have
been actively engaged in the practice of alternative hair design for at least twelve
months prior to beginning the instructor's course, and have successfully passed the
examination prescribed by the board for certification as a teacher of alternative hair
design.
* * *
§584. Certificates of temporary registration; special permits
* * *
C. The board may adopt rules and regulations for the issuance of special
permits, which shall include but not be limited to an alternative hair design special
permit, to allow limited and specific powers within the practice of cosmetology.
* * *
Page 4 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-804 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 912
§586. Examination of applicants
A.(1) The examination team and testing service contracted by the board shall
conduct examinations of applicants for certificates as registered cosmetologists,
estheticians, manicurists, alternative hairstylists, teachers, and for any special permit
issued by the board which requires testing at such times and places as deemed
appropriate by the board.
* * *
(3) Esthetician, manicurist, alternative hair design, and teacher examinations
shall be conducted at least four times per calendar year.
* * *
§589. Certificates of registration for managers
A. Any cosmetology salon owner or mobile salon owner who is not a
licensed cosmetologist, any manicuring salon owner who is not a licensed
manicurist, any alternative hair deign salon owner who is not a licensed alternative
hairstylist, and any esthetics salon owner who is not a licensed esthetician shall
employ one or more registered managers who shall be a licensed cosmetologist;
however, a registered manicurist may manage a manicuring salon, a registered
alternative hairstylist may manage an alternative hair design salon, and a registered
esthetician may manage an esthetics salon. A registered manager shall be present
at the salon during all hours of operation and shall be responsible for ensuring that
all persons practicing cosmetology within the facility are appropriately licensed and
follow all applicable laws and rules and regulations.
B. A shop owner who is absent from his respective shop more than two
working days per week shall employ a manager, who shall be a registered
cosmetologist and who shall obtain a certificate of registration as a manager.
However, a registered manicurist may manage a manicuring salon, a registered
alternative hairstylist may manage an alternative hair design salon, and a registered
esthetician may manage an esthetics salon.
* * *
Page 5 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-804 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 912
§590. Renewal of certificates of registration
A.
* * *
(2) Every registered cosmetologist, esthetician, manicurist, alternative
hairstylist, or teacher who continues to actively practice his licensed profession shall
renew his certificate of registration on or before such individual's date of birth, and
such certificate shall expire thirty days following the date of birth if not renewed.
* * *
§595. Requirements for schools
* * *
B. All registered cosmetology schools may offer one or more of the
following courses, and postsecondary schools shall offer one or more of the
following courses only as a postsecondary educational program:
* * *
(6) A course of practical training and technical instruction extending over a
period of not less than three and a half consecutive months and including not less
than six hundred hours for the basic course of alternative hair design leading to an
alternative hair design certificate sufficient to apply for licensure as an alternative
hairstylist. This course of study shall include all of the following:
(a) History overview including all of the following:
(i) Ancient origins of braiding.
(ii) Traditional multi-cultural braid styles.
(iii) The multi-cultural American hair experience.
(b) Bacteriology and sanitation including all of the following:
(i) Growth and reproduction of bacteria.
(ii) Prevention of infection and infection control including safety, sanitation,
and electricity.
(iii) Use of antiseptics, disinfectants, and detergents.
(c) Client consultation.
Page 6 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-804 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 912
(d) Hair types and hair structure.
(e) Scalp diseases and disorders.
(f) Shampoos, conditioners, co-washing, herbal treatments, and rinses for
synthetic hair only.
(g) Braiding, natural hair braiding, LOC method, cutting, synthetic or natural
hair additions, styling and sculpting.
(h) Arranging, curling, dressing with mechanical devices and other similar
procedures with using a blow dryer.
(i) Louisiana Cosmetology Act and rules and regulations.
(7) A period of continuing study in alternative hair design, including a course
of not less than six weeks duration and containing not less than two hundred hours
of study.
(8) A course of practical training and technical instruction extending over a
period of not less than one month and including not less than one hundred hours that
would allow a person who holds an alternative hair design special permit to obtain
an alternative hair design certificate sufficient to apply for licensure as an alternative
hairstylist. This course of study shall include all areas covered by the alternative hair
design license but not the alternative hair design permit.
(6)(9) A "brush up" course, of not less than six weeks and not less than two
hundred hours of study for any course of study offered by the school.
(7)(10) A cosmetology course that is not less than two hundred fifty hours
for individuals seeking reciprocity from a jurisdiction that does not meet the
requirements for licensure in Louisiana.
(8)(11) A course of instruction leading to an instructor certificate, if the
school is a postsecondary school.
* * *
§599. Fees
A. The following fees shall be assessed by the board:
* * *
Page 7 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-804 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 912
(2) For each initial certificate of registration and each annual renewal of such
certificate:
(a) Cosmetologist, esthetician, manicurist, alternative hairstylist,
teacher/instructor, or manager $35.00
* * *